Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB215.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5(d) of the act of May 23, 1945 (P.L.913, No.367), known as the Engineer, Land Surveyor and Geologist Registration Law, is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 5. Exemption from Licensure and Registration.--Except as specifically provided in this section, this act shall 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 not be construed to require licensure and registration in the following cases:* * *(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this section, the practice of engineering or land surveying by a regular employe, contractor or agent of a public utility company, as defined by the Public Utility Code (66 Pa.C.S. § 101 et seq.) in connection with the facilities of such public utility, which are subject to regulation by the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission: Provided, That such public utility shall employ at least one professional engineer, as defined in this act, who shall be in responsible charge of such utility's engineering work and shall employ at least one professional land surveyor, as defined in this act, who shall be in responsible charge of such utility's land surveying;* * *(f.1) The practice of engineering or land surveying by a regular employe, contractor or agent of an electric cooperative corporation, as defined in 15 Pa.C.S. § 7302(a) (relating to application of chapter), in connection with the facilities of the electric cooperative corporation, provided that the electric cooperative corporation or agent thereof either shall employ at least one professional engineer or professional land surveyor or belong to a Pennsylvania electric cooperative association that employs a professional engineer or professional land surveyor.* * *(l) The practice of engineering, land surveying or geology work by a regular employe, contractor or agent of a provider of cable service, voice over Internet protocol service, broadband Internet access service or any other service delivered over a 20250SB0215PN0165 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cable system, a provider of enhanced telecommunications services or a provider of telecommunications services, if those services are not connected with or incidental to engineering, land surveying or geology services rendered by the provider.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0215PN0165 - 3 - 12345